Hawaii statutes.
§226-24 Objective and policies for
socio-cultural advancement--individual rights and personal well-being.
(a) Planning for the State's socio-cultural advancement with regard to
individual rights and personal well-being shall be directed towards achievement
of the objective of increased opportunities and protection of individual rights
to enable individuals to fulfill their socio-economic needs and aspirations.

(b) To achieve the individual rights and
personal well-being objective, it shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Provide effective services and activities that
protect individuals from criminal acts and unfair practices and that alleviate
the consequences of criminal acts in order to foster a safe and secure
environment.

(2) Uphold and protect the national and state
constitutional rights of every individual.

(3) Assure access to, and availability of, legal
assistance, consumer protection, and other public services which strive to
attain social justice.

(4) Ensure equal opportunities for individual
participation in society. [L 1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L 1986, c 276, §23]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next